Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Reports
[Repealed]

§§ 77-9-411 through 77-9-415.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§77-9-411. [Codes, 1892, § 4320; 1906, § 4874; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7659; 1930, § 7052; 1942, § 7828]

§77-9-413. [Codes, 1892, § 4321; 1906, § 4875; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7660; 1930, § 7053; 1942, § 7829; Laws, 1918, ch. 147]

§77-9-415. [Codes, 1892, § 4322; 1906, § 4876; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7661; 1930, § 7054; 1942, § 7830]